nl: Munt kwaliteit (numismatisch): AG-3 (About Good); AU-50 (About Uncirculated); F-12 (Fine); FR-2 (Fair); G-4 (Good); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Poor); VF-20 (Very Fine); VG-8 (Very Good); XF-40 (Extremely Fine); Overig
lt-LT: Monetos kokybė (numizmatika): AG-3 (Beveik gera); AU-50 (Beveik nebuvusi apyvartoje); F-12 (Graži); FR-2 (Patenkinama); G-4 (Gera); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Prasta); VF-20 (Labai graži); VG-8 (Labai gera); XF-40 (Ypač graži); Kita
pt-BR: Grau de qualidade da moeda (numismática): AG-3 (About Good); AU-50 (About Uncirculated); F-12 (Fine); FR-2 (Fair); G-4 (Good); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Poor); VF-20 (Very Fine); VG-8 (Very Good); XF-40 (Extremely Fine); Outros
de: Erhaltungsgrad der Münze (numismatisch): AG-3 (Fast gut); AU-50 (Fast Stempelglanz); F-12 (Schön); FR-2 (Gering erhalten); G-4 (Gut erhalten); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Schlecht erhalten); VF-20 (Sehr schön); VG-8 (Sehr gut erhalten); XF-40 (Vorzüglich); Andere
fr: Grade de la pièce (numismatique): AG-3 (Presque bon); AU-50 (Presque non circulé); F-12 (Beau); FR-2 (Passable); G-4 (Bon); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Médiocre); VF-20 (Très beau); VG-8 (Très bon); XF-40 (Extrêmement beau); Autre
sv: Myntkvalitet (numismatisk): AG-3 (nästan god); AU-50 (nästan okirkulerad); F-12 (fin); FR-2 (hygglig); G-4 (god); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (dålig); VF-20 (mycket fin); VG-8 (mycket god); XF-40 (extremt fin); Övrigt
sk-SK: Kvalita mince (numizmatická): AG-3 (Takmer dobrá); AU-50 (Takmer neobehová); F-12 (Zachovalá); FR-2 (Uspokojivá); G-4 (Dobrá); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Zlá); VF-20 (Veľmi zachovalá); VG-8 (Veľmi dobrá); XF-40 (Mimoriadne zachovalá); Iné
zh-CN: 硬币等级（钱币学）: AG-3（近佳）; AU-50（近未使用品）; F-12（美品）; FR-2（劣品）; G-4（佳品）; MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1（差品）; VF-20（极美品）; VG-8（优品）; XF-40（优美品）; 其他
vi: Xếp hạng tiền xu (numismatic): AG-3 (About Good); AU-50 (About Uncirculated); F-12 (Fine); FR-2 (Fair); G-4 (Good); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Poor); VF-20 (Very Fine); VG-8 (Very Good); XF-40 (Extremely Fine); Khác
es: Grado de conservación de la moneda (numismática): AG-3 (Casi buena); AU-50 (Casi sin circular); F-12 (Fina); FR-2 (Regular); G-4 (Buena); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Pobre); VF-20 (Muy fina); VG-8 (Muy buena); XF-40 (Extremadamente fina); Otro
el: Βαθμός νομίσματος (νομισματικός): AG-3 (About Good); AU-50 (About Uncirculated); F-12 (Fine); FR-2 (Fair); G-4 (Good); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Poor); VF-20 (Very Fine); VG-8 (Very Good); XF-40 (Extremely Fine); Άλλο
sl-SI: Razred kovancev (numizmatičen): AG-3 (skoraj dobro); AU-50 (skoraj neobtočno); F-12 (lepo); FR-2 (zadovoljivo); G-4 (dobro); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (slabo); VF-20 (zelo lepo); VG-8 (zelo dobro); XF-40 (izjemno lepo); Drugo
ro-RO: Gradul monedei (numismatic): AG-3 (Aproape bun); AU-50 (Aproape necirculată); F-12 (Frumoasă); FR-2 (Acceptabilă); G-4 (Bună); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Slabă); VF-20 (Foarte frumoasă); VG-8 (Foarte bună); XF-40 (Extrem de frumoasă); Altele
tr: Madeni para derecesi (nümismatik): AG-3 (Neredeyse İyi); AU-50 (Neredeyse Çil); F-12 (Temiz); FR-2 (Makul); G-4 (İyi); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Zayıf); VF-20 (Çok Temiz); VG-8 (Çok İyi); XF-40 (Çok Çok Temiz); Diğer
ja: コインのグレード（貨幣学）: AG-3 (About Good); AU-50 (About Uncirculated); F-12 (Fine); FR-2 (Fair); G-4 (Good); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Poor); VF-20 (Very Fine); VG-8 (Very Good); XF-40 (Extremely Fine); その他
zh-TW: 硬幣等級（錢幣學）: AG-3 (About Good); AU-50 (About Uncirculated); F-12 (Fine); FR-2 (Fair); G-4 (Good); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Poor); VF-20 (Very Fine); VG-8 (Very Good); XF-40 (Extremely Fine); 其他
pt-PT: Grau de qualidade da moeda (numismática): AG-3 (Quase bom); AU-50 (Quase não circulada); F-12 (Fina); FR-2 (Razoável); G-4 (Boa); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Má); VF-20 (Muito fina); VG-8 (Muito boa); XF-40 (Extremamente fina); Outra
da: Møntkvalitet (numismatisk): AG-3 (About Good); AU-50 (About Uncirculated); F-12 (Fine); FR-2 (Fair); G-4 (Good); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Poor); VF-20 (Very Fine); VG-8 (Very Good); XF-40 (Extremely Fine); Andet
pl: Stan monety (numizmatyczny): AG-3 (About Good); AU-50 (About Uncirculated); F-12 (Fine); FR-2 (Fair); G-4 (Good); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Poor); VF-20 (Very Fine); VG-8 (Very Good); XF-40 (Extremely Fine); Inna
ru: Нумизматическая степень сохранности монеты: AG-3 (Почти хорошее); AU-50 (Почти превосходное); F-12 (Хорошее); FR-2 (Удовлетворительное); G-4 (Вполне хорошее); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Плохое); VF-20 (Очень хорошее); VG-8 (Весьма хорошее); XF-40 (Отличное); Другое
bg-BG: Клас на монетата (нумизматично): AG-3 (Почти добра); AU-50 (Почти нециркулирала); F-12 (Фина); FR-2 (Задоволителна); G-4 (Добра); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Лоша); VF-20 (Много фина); VG-8 (Много добра); XF-40 (Изключително фина); Други
ko: 동전 등급(화폐학): AG-3 (About Good); AU-50 (About Uncirculated); F-12 (Fine); FR-2 (Fair); G-4 (Good); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Poor); VF-20 (Very Fine); VG-8 (Very Good); XF-40 (Extremely Fine); 기타
cs: Zachovalost mince (numismatika): AG-3 (téměř dobrá); AU-50 (téměř neobíhající); F-12 (pěkná); FR-2 (zachovalá); G-4 (dobrá); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (velmi špatná); VF-20 (velmi pěkná); VG-8 (velmi dobrá); XF-40 (mimořádně pěkná); Jiná
hu: Érmeminőség (numizmatikai): AG-3 (Nagyjából jó); AU-50 (Majdnem verdefényes); F-12 (Szép); FR-2 (Tűrhető); G-4 (Jó); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Gyenge); VF-20 (Nagyon szép); VG-8 (Nagyon jó); XF-40 (Kiválóan szép); Egyéb
it: Grado di conservazione delle monete (numismatica): AG-3 (About Good); AU-50 (About Uncirculated); F-12 (Fine); FR-2 (Fair); G-4 (Good); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Poor); VF-20 (Very Fine); VG-8 (Very Good); XF-40 (Extremely Fine); Altro
nb: Myntkvalitet (numismatisk): AG-3 (nesten god); AU-50 (nesten usirkulert); F-12 (fin); FR-2 (rimelig); G-4 (god); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (dårlig); VF-20 (veldig fin); VG-8 (veldig god); XF-40 (ekstremt fin); Annet
hr-HR: Ocjena kovanice (numizmatika): AG-3 (skoro dobar); AU-50 (skoro necirkuliran); F-12 (fin); FR-2 (očuvan); G-4 (dobar); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (loš); VF-20 (vrlo fin); VG-8 (vrlo dobar); XF-40 (iznimno fin); Ostalo
th: ระดับการจัดเกรดเหรียญ (เหรียญที่ระลึก): AG-3 (เกือบดี); AU-50 (เกือบไม่ผ่านการใช้งาน); F-12 (ดี); FR-2 (พอใช้); G-4 (ดี); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (แย่); VF-20 (ดีมาก); VG-8 (ดีมาก); XF-40 (ดีเยี่ยม); อื่นๆ
en: Coin grade (numismatic): AG-3 (About Good); AU-50 (About Uncirculated); F-12 (Fine); FR-2 (Fair); G-4 (Good); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Poor); VF-20 (Very Fine); VG-8 (Very Good); XF-40 (Extremely Fine); Other
fi: Kolikon laatu (numismaattinen): AG-3 (About Good); AU-50 (About Uncirculated); F-12 (Fine); FR-2 (Fair); G-4 (Good); MS/PF-60; MS/PF-61; MS/PF-62; MS/PF-63; MS/PF-64; MS/PF-65; MS/PF-66; MS/PF-67; MS/PF-68; MS/PF-69; MS/PF-70; PO-1 (Poor); VF-20 (Very Fine); VG-8 (Very Good); XF-40 (Extremely Fine); Muu